Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
132D

FIREWORKS

Section

132D-1 Title

132D-2 Definitions

132D-3 Permissible uses of consumer fireworks

132D-4 Permissible uses of display fireworks,
articles

pyrotechnic, and aerial devices

132D-5 General prohibitions

132D-6 Exceptions

132D-7 License or permit required

132D-8 Application for license

132D-8.5 Importation of aerial devices, display
fireworks,

or articles pyrotechnic for display

132D-8.6 Requirements of licensee

132D-9 Application for permit

132D-10 Permits

132D-11 Fee

132D-12 Sale to minors; sale by minors; prohibited

132D-13 Liability of parents or guardians

132D-14 Penalty

132D-15 Notice requirements

132D-16 Permit for display

132D-16.5 Labeling of display fireworks

132D-16.6 Display site inspection

132D-16.7 Display stop order

132D-17 Repealed

132D-17.5 County ordinances

132D-18 Effect on other laws

132D-19 Repealed

132D-20 Enforcement

132D-21 Health care facilities; report of
fireworks and

articles pyrotechnic incidents

Cross References

Aerial luminaries, see §132-19.

Case Notes

Honolulu city ordinance prohibiting the importation of
consumer fireworks into Honolulu was an ordinance that was "more stringent
in the control or prohibition of fireworks" enacted within the city's
power granted under this chapter. 796 F. Supp. 2d 1261 (2011).

Discussed: 87 H. 71, 951 P.2d 934.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next